Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1408.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 227. Language of Materials and Services.--Unless 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 otherwise required by Federal law, all printed information, publicly accessible Internet websites and government services provided or distributed by the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions shall be exclusively in the official language of the United States of America as established by Federal law or Presidential executive order.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1408PN1610 - 2 - 1234567